Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Licensing and Recording

402.100.
Marriage license — Marriage certificate — Confidentiality of Social Security or other government-issued identification card numbers.

Each county clerk shall make available to the public the form prescribed by the Department for Libraries and Archives for the issuance of a marriage license. The department shall issue a marriage license form which provides for the entering of information identifying each party as a “bride,” “groom,” or “spouse.” This form shall provide for the entering of all of the information required in this section, and may also provide for the entering of additional information prescribed by the Department for Libraries and Archives. The form shall consist of:

A marriage license which provides for the entering of:

An authorization statement for any person or religious society authorized to perform marriage ceremonies to unite in marriage the parties named;

Vital information for each party, including the full name, date of birth, place of birth, race, gender, condition (single, widowed, or divorced), number of previous marriages, occupation, current residence, relationship to the other party, and full names of parents;

A statement signed by both parties swearing that, to the best of their knowledge, the information provided on the form is correct; and

The date and place the application was made.

A marriage certificate which provides for the entering of:

A statement by the person performing the marriage ceremony or the clerk of the religious society authorized to solemnize the marriage ceremony that the ceremony was performed. The statement shall include the name and title of the person performing the ceremony or the name of the religious society solemnizing the marriage, the names of persons married, the date and place of the marriage, and the names of two (2) witnesses;

A statement by the person performing the marriage ceremony of his legal qualification under this chapter to perform the ceremony, such statement to include the name of the county or city where his license to perform marriage ceremonies was issued or, in the case of religious societies authorized by KRS 402.050(1)(c) to solemnize marriages, the name of the city or county where the religious society is incorporated. The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to require the clerk of a religious society to be present at the marriage so long as the witnesses of the society are present;

The printed name and dated signature of the person performing the ceremony; and

A signed statement indicating that the marriage certificate was recorded in the county in which it was filed. The statement shall also include the title of the county clerk or deputy clerk of the county in which the certificate was filed and indicate the date the marriage certificate was recorded.

A certificate to be delivered by the person performing the marriage ceremony or the clerk of the religious society performing the marriage ceremony to the parties married. This certificate shall provide for the entering of:

A statement by the person performing the marriage ceremony or the clerk of the religious society performing the marriage ceremony that the ceremony was performed. The statement shall include the name and title of the person performing the ceremony, or the name of the religious society performing the ceremony, the names of persons married, the date and place of the marriage, and the names of two (2) witnesses; and

A dated signature of the person performing the ceremony or the clerk of the religious society performing the ceremony.

A Social Security card or other government-issued identification card shall be requested as a means of identification of each party but the number shall not be recorded or retained.

HISTORY:

2103: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 15, § 1; 1984, ch. 279, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 220, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 428, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 621, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 101, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 132, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 177, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by 1984 Acts Chapter 111, § 158, and 1984 Acts Chapter 279, § 2, which are in conflict and cannot be compiled together. Pursuant to
KRS

7.123

, the amendment in Chapter 279, § 2, the nonrevisory Act, prevails.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a marriage was performed by Quakers, the marriage certificate should show that it was effectuated by saying of vows in the presence of the society which event was witnessed by the clerk of the society signing the certificate.

OAG 63-24

.

The marriage register or marriage certificate can be typed, but the signatures of the applicants and of the clerk or deputy must be placed on the record, since a basic purpose of the marriage certificate data is to preserve the data as documentary evidence of the fact of marriage.

OAG 78-381

.

If either applicant is divorced, they must so state, but there is no express requirement for an attested copy of a divorce decree even though one of the applicants states that he or she is divorced.

OAG 78-431

.

Where minister, on the basis of presented license of marriage, performed marriage ceremony and completed the certificates mentioned in this section, but in returning the certificate to the clerk, the license-certificate was lost in the mail, in view of the public policy favoring marriage, clerk could issue a certified “duplicate” marriage license to the parties, which could then be delivered to the solemnizing minister for filling out the subject certificates and returning such duplicate license for filing; after first requiring the minister and the wedded parties to sign an affidavit, to be filed with clerk, stating that the minister did on a certain day take the original marriage license and solemnize the marriage between the subject parties.

OAG 82-242

.

The General Assembly in KRS

402.020

expressed a sensitive and social concern about the marriages of persons of tender age; accordingly, the county clerk may require that the applicants for marriage produce for copying a driver’s license, or a birth certificate or copy thereof, or in lieu of any of the above an affidavit of the parents or guardian as to the specific age of the applicants.

OAG 82-453

.

Where a marriage license was issued and the bride gave the name of her adoptive parents but she later learned that this couple were only legal guardians, since the data relating to the parents of the parties to the marriage is not a critical factor affecting the validity of the marriage, the validity of the marriage is not affected by this error; moreover where as here, the ceremony can be proved the court will uphold the marriage, and in absence of a court order the clerk has no authority to correct such record.

OAG 82-557

.

While an applicant for a marriage license is not required to have a Social Security number, if an applicant does have one, it must be disclosed to the county clerk, or, there must be an express declaration that the applicant does not have such number.

OAG 04-004

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Marriage License, § 5.2.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Marriage, Form 1.3.

402.105.
Marriage license valid for thirty days.

A marriage license shall be valid for thirty (30) days, including the date it is issued, and after that time it shall be invalid.

History.

2105a-3; repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 111, § 159, effective July 13, 1984.

402.110.
Marriage license to be uniform and completely filled out — Exception under KRS 402.100.

Except as provided in KRS

402.100

(1), the form of marriage license prescribed in KRS

402.100

shall be uniform throughout this state, and every license blank shall contain the identical words and figures provided in the form prescribed by KRS 402.100. In issuing the license the clerk shall deliver it in its entirety to the licensee. The clerk shall see to it that every blank space required to be filled by the applicants is so filled before delivering it to the licensee.

History.

2103a: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 279, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2016 ch. 132, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where both of the parties are 18, the clerk could issue a marriage license with only the bride or groom present to sign the marriage register.

OAG 70-481

.

The marriage license application should not be mailed and returned by mail; the application should be made by the applicants in person in the clerk’s office.

OAG 82-416

.

While an applicant for a marriage license is not required to have a Social Security number, if an applicant does have one, it must be disclosed to the county clerk, or, there must be an express declaration that the applicant does not have such number.

OAG 04-004

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Marriage License, § 5.2.

402.120.
Medical examination required — Exception. [Repealed.]

402.130.
Medical examination — Laboratory tests. [Repealed.]

402.140.
Procedure upon return of examination. [Repealed.]

402.150.
License for marriage of pregnant woman without medical certificate. [Repealed.]

402.160.
Submission of specimen to laboratory — Report to department. [Repealed.]

402.170.
Protest after refusal of medical certificate and marriage license — Hearing. [Repealed.]

402.180.
Appeal to circuit court. [Repealed.]

402.190.
Marriage license valid for thirty days. — [Renumbered.]

402.200.
County health officer to advise district court. [Repealed.]

402.205.
Petition to court by seventeen year old for permission to marry — Evidentiary hearing — Reasons for denying petition — Effect of pregnancy — Emancipation of minor — Other court-imposed conditions — Fee.

A minor who is seventeen (17) years of age may petition the family court in the county in which the minor resides, or the District Court in that county if a family court division has not been established in that county, for an order granting permission to marry. The petition shall contain the following:

The petitioner’s name, gender, age, date of birth, address, and how long the petitioner has resided at that address, as well as prior addresses and dates of residence for the six (6) months preceding the petition;

The intended spouse’s name, gender, age, date of birth, address, and how long the intended spouse has resided at that address, as well as prior addresses and dates of residence for the six (6) months preceding the petition;

An affidavit attesting to the consent to marry signed by:

The father or the mother of the petitioner, if the parents are married, the parents are not legally separated, no legal guardian has been appointed for petitioner, and no court order has been issued granting custody of petitioner to a party other than the father or mother;

Both the father and the mother, if both are living and the parents are divorced or legally separated, and a court order of joint custody to the parents of the petitioner has been issued and is in effect;

The surviving parent, if the parents were divorced or legally separated, and a court order of joint custody to the parents of the petitioner was issued prior to the death of either the father or mother, which order remains in effect;

The custodial parent, as established by a court order which has not been superseded, where the parents are divorced or legally separated and joint custody of the petitioner has not been ordered; or

Another person having lawful custodial charge of the petitioner;

A statement of the reasons why the petitioner desires to marry, how the parties came to know each other, and how long they have known each other;

Evidence of the petitioner’s maturity and capacity for self-sufficiency independent of the petitioner’s parents and the intended spouse, including but not limited to:

Proof that the petitioner has maintained stable housing or employment for at least three (3) consecutive months prior to the petition; and

Proof that the petitioner has completed high school, obtained a High School Equivalency Diploma, or completed a vocational training or certificate program;

Copies of any criminal records of either party to be married; and

Copies of any domestic violence order or interpersonal protective order involving either party to be married.

Upon the filing of the petition for permission to marry, the court shall set a datefor an evidentiary hearing on the petition that is no sooner than thirty (30) days but not later than sixty (60) days from the date of the filing.

The petitioner may be represented by counsel in court proceeding pertaining to the petition to marry.

The court shall take reasonable measures to ensure that any representations made by a minor party are free of coercion, undue influence, or duress. Reasonable measures shall include but are not limited to in camera interviews.

Following an evidentiary hearing, the court shall grant the minor’s petition for permission to marry unless:

The age difference between the parties is more than four (4) years;

The intended spouse was or is a person in a position of authority or a position of special trust as defined in KRS

532.045

in relation to the minor;

The intended spouse has previously been enjoined by a domestic violence order or interpersonal protective order, regardless of whether or not the person to be protected by the order was the minor petitioner;

The intended spouse has been convicted of or entered into a diversion program for a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS

17.500

or for a violent or sexual criminal offense under KRS Chapter 506, 507, 507A, 508, 509, 510, 529, 530, or 531;

The court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the minor was a victim and that the intended spouse was the perpetrator of a sexual offense against the minor under KRS

510.040

,

510.050

,

510.060

,

510.110

,

510.120

, or

510.130

;

The court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that abuse, coercion, undue influence, or duress is present; or

The court finds that it would otherwise not be in the minor party’s best interest to grant the petition to marry.

A past or current pregnancy of the minor or the intended spouse shall not be sufficient evidence to establish that the best interests of the minor would be served by granting the petition for marriage.

The granting of a petition for permission to marry filed under subsection (1) of this section shall remove the disabilities of minority. A minor emancipated by the petition shall be considered to have all the rights and responsibilities of an adult, except for specific constitutional or statutory age requirements, including but not limited to voting, the use of alcoholic beverages, and other health and safety regulations relevant to him or her because of his or her age.

The minor shall be advised by the court of the rights and responsibilities of parties to a marriage and of emancipated minors. The minor shall be provided with a fact sheet on these rights and responsibilities to be developed by the Office of the Attorney General and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The fact sheet shall include referral information for legal aid agencies in the Commonwealth and national hotlines for domestic violence and sexual assault.

The court may make any other orders that the court deems appropriate for the minor’s protection and may impose any other condition on the grant of the petition that the court determines is reasonable under the circumstances for the minor’s protection.

The court may set a fee not to exceed twenty dollars ($20) to file a petition for permission to marry under this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 36, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

402.210.
Requirements for issuance of license.

Both parties to a marriage shall:

Be present for a marriage license to be issued; and

Present to the county clerk documentary proof of age in the form of:

A copy of a birth record;

A certification of birth issued by the state department of health, a local registrar of vital statistics, or other public office charged with similar duties by the laws of another state, territory, or country;

A baptismal record showing the individual’s date of birth;

A passport;

An automobile driver’s license;

Any government or school issued identification card showing the individual’s date of birth;

An immigration record showing the individual’s date of birth;

A naturalization record showing the individual’s date of birth; or

A court record or any other document or record issued by a government entity showing the individual’s date of birth.

If either of the parties is under seventeen (17) years of age, no license shall be issued.

If either of the parties is seventeen (17) years of age, a marriage license shall not be issued unless:

The party who is seventeen (17) years of age presents to the clerk a certified copy of a court order by a family court or District Court judge that grants the party permission to marry and removes the party’s disability of minority, as provided in KRS

402.205

; and

At least fifteen (15) days have elapsed since the court order was granted.

HISTORY:

2106: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 100, § 15; 1974, ch. 386, § 93; 1988, ch. 212, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 122, § 3, effective March 26, 1998; 1998, ch. 258, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 36, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

402.220.
Return of license and certificate to clerk after ceremony.

The person solemnizing the marriage or the clerk of the religious society before which it was solemnized shall within one (1) month return the license to the county clerk of the county in which it was issued, with a certificate of the marriage over his signature, giving the date and place of celebration and the names of at least two (2) of the persons present.

History.

2107: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 279, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 220, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

402.230.
Filing of marriage certificate — Record of marriages.

The certificate shall be filed in the county clerk’s office. The county clerk shall keep in a record book a fair register of the parties’ names, the person by whom, or the religious society by which, the marriage was solemnized, the date when the marriage was solemnized, and shall keep an index to the book in which the register is made.

History.

2108, 2108-1; 1994, ch. 220, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

402.240.
County judge/executive to issue license in absence of clerk.

In the absence of the county clerk, or during a vacancy in the office, the county judge/executive may issue the license and, in so doing, he shall perform the duties and incur all the responsibilities of the clerk. The county judge/executive shall return a memorandum thereof to the clerk, and the memorandum shall be recorded as if the license had been issued by the clerk.

History.

2113.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Marriage License, § 5.9.